dictsource/ab_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Abkhaz


.group а
   а       a
   аа      a:

.group б
   б       b

.group в
   в       v

.group г
   г       g
   гь      g;
   гә      gw

.group ӷ
   ӷ       Q"
   ӷь      Q^
   ӷә      Q"w

.group д
   д       d
   дә      dw

.group е
    _)  е  ja
   е       e
   е (_    aj

.group ж
   ж       z.
   жь      Z
   жә      Zw

.group з
   з       z

.group ӡ
   ӡ       dz
   ӡә      dZ;w

.group и
    _)  и  ji#
   и       i
   и (_    i#j

.group к
   к       k`
   кь      k`j
   кә      k`w

.group қ
   қ       k
   қь      k;
   қә      kw

.group ҟ
   ҟ       q`
   ҟь      q`j
   ҟә      q`w

.group л
   л       l

.group м
   м       m

.group н
   н       n

.group о
    _)  о  wa
   о       o
   о (_    aw

.group п
   п       p`

.group ԥ
   ԥ       ph

.group р
   р       r

.group с
   с       s

.group т
   т       t`
   тә      t`w

.group ҭ
   ҭ       t#
   ҭә      t#w

.group у
    _)  у  wi#
   у       u
   у (_    i#w

.group ф
   ф       f

.group х
   х       X
   хь      Xj
   хә      Xw

.group ҳ
   ҳ       H
   ҳә      Hw

.group ц
   ц       tsh
   цә      tS;hw

.group ҵ
   ҵ       ts`?
   ҵә      ts`?w

.group ч
   ч       tS;h

.group ҷ
   ҷ       tS`

.group ҽ
   ҽ       ts.h

.group ҿ
   ҿ       ts.`?

.group ш
   ш       s.
   шь      S
   шә      Sw

.group ы
   ы       i#

.group ҩ
   ҩ       #

.group џ
   џ       dz.
   џь      J

.group ь
   ь       ;

.group ә
   ә       w

.group
   гу      gw     // pre-1996
   ҕ       Q"     // pre-1996
   ҕь      Q^     // pre-1996
   ҕу      Q"w     // pre-1996
   ку      k`w     // pre-1996
   ӄу      kw     // pre-1996
   ҟу      q`w     // pre-1996
   ҧ       ph     // pre-1996
   ху      Xw     // pre-1996
